Washington statutes.
RCW 15.13.390

Unlawful selling, shipment, or transport of horticultural plants or Christmas trees within state, when. (Effective until July 1, 2030.)

It is unlawful for any person to sell, ship, or transport any horticultural plant or Christmas tree in this state unless it meets standards established in rule for freedom from infestation by plant pests and the other requirements of this chapter.

[ 2007 c 335 s 11; 2000 c 144 s 17; 1993 c 120 s 9; 1971 ex.s. c 33 s 15.]

NOTES:

Expiration date—2019 c 206; 2013 c 72; 2007 c 335: See note following RCW 15.13.250.

PDFRCW 15.13.390

Unlawful selling, shipment, or transport of plants within state, when. (Effective July 1, 2030.)

It is unlawful for any person to sell, ship, or transport any horticultural plant in this state unless it meets standards established in rule for freedom from infestation by plant pests and the other requirements of this chapter.

[ 2000 c 144 s 17; 1993 c 120 s 9; 1971 ex.s. c 33 s 15.]